District of Columbia statutes.
7-2001

Definitions.

(a)

“Child” means “child” as defined in § 4-401(1).

(b)

“Child development center” means “child development center” as defined in § 4-401(2).

(c)

“Child development home” means “child development home” as defined in § 4-401(3).

(d)

“Fund” means the Child Care Services Assistance Fund established by § 7-2002.

(e)

“Person” means an individual, partnership, association, or corporation.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-220, § 2, 36 DCR 550

History

1981 Ed., § 6-3601.

Prior Codifications